Washington statutes.
RCW 41.28.005

Establishment of retirement and pension systems authorized.

Any city attaining the status of a first-class city after July 1, 1939, is empowered by this chapter to establish retirement and pension systems for superannuated or totally and permanently disabled officers and employees of cities of the first class.

[ 1939 c 207 s 1; RRS s 9592-101. Formerly RCW 41.28.020, part.]